Utah statutes.
76-10-803.   "Public nuisance" defined -- Agricultural operations.
(1)  A public nuisance is a crime against the order and economy of the state
and consists in unlawfully doing any act or omitting to perform any duty,
which act or omission:
(a)  annoys, injures, or endangers the comfort, repose, health, or safety of
three or more persons;
(b)  offends public decency;
(c)  unlawfully interferes with, obstructs, or tends to obstruct, or renders
dangerous for passage, any lake, stream, canal, or basin, or any public park,
square, street, or highway;
(d)  is a nuisance as defined in Section 78B-6-1107; or
(e)  in any way renders three or more persons insecure in life or the use of
property.
(2)  An act which affects three or more persons in any of the ways specified
in this section is still a nuisance regardless of the extent to which the
annoyance or damage inflicted on individuals is unequal.
(3) (a) Activities conducted in the normal and ordinary course of agricultural
operations, as defined in Subsection 78B-6-1101(7), and conducted in
accordance with sound agricultural practices are presumed to be reasonable and
not constitute a public nuisance under Subsection (1).
(b)  Agricultural operations undertaken in conformity with federal, state, and
local laws and regulations, including zoning ordinances, are presumed to be
operating within sound agricultural practices.
